Maryland, session 2026, HB0937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “RV park” means a designated area with sites for temporary overnight
or seasonal use of:
(i) a camping trailer as defined in § 11–106 of the Transportation
Article; or
(ii) a park model recreation vehicle as defined in § 11–144.1 of the
Transportation Article.
(3) “Youth camp” has the meaning stated in COMAR 10.16.06.02.
(b) There is a Workgroup to Study Youth Camp and RV Park Emergency
Preparedness.
(c) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0937*

HOUSE BILL 937
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Emergency Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the State Fire Marshal;
(7) one representative of the Youth Camp Safety Advisory Council; and
(8) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) two representatives who are actively engaged in the ownership
or management of a youth camp; and
(ii) two representatives who are actively engaged in the ownership
or management of an RV park.
(d) The Governor, in coordination with the President of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House, shall designate the chair of the Workgroup.
(e) The Department of the Environment shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(f) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) (1) The Workgroup shall:
(i) if applicable, study model local emergency preparedness policies
in the State for youth camps and RV parks;
(ii) review recently enacted legislation in other states that addresses
emergency preparedness policies for youth camps and RV parks, including in California
and Texas;
(iii) create an inventory, disaggregated by county, of all youth camps
and RV parks in the State; and

HOUSE BILL 937 3
(iv) make recommendations regarding potential legislation to
address statewide emergency preparedness policies for youth camps and RV parks.
(2) In creating the inventory required under paragraph (1)(iii) of this
subsection, the Workgroup shall seek input from county and other local governments,
tourism agencies, and entities responsible for permitting youth camps and RV parks in the
State.
(h) On or before December 31, 2027, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.